Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.620.020

Restrictions—Classes on parenting skills and child abuse prevention encouraged.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28B.50.250, 28B.50.530 or any other law, rule, or regulation, any school district is authorized and encouraged to provide community education programs in the form of instructional, recreational and/or service programs on a noncredit and nontuition basis, excluding fees for supplies, materials, or instructor costs, for the purpose of stimulating the full educational potential and meeting the needs of the district's residents of all ages, and making the fullest use of the district's school facilities: PROVIDED, That school districts are encouraged to provide programs for prospective parents, prospective foster parents, and prospective adoptive parents on parenting skills, violence prevention, and on the problems of child abuse and methods to avoid child abuse situations: PROVIDED FURTHER, That community education programs shall be consistent with rules and regulations promulgated by the state superintendent of public instruction governing cooperation between common schools, community college districts, and other civic and governmental organizations which shall have been developed in cooperation with the state board for community and technical colleges and shall be programs receiving the approval of said superintendent.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 603; 1985 c 344 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 120 s 2; 1973 c 138 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.247.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.